Massachusetts, session 194th, S1848.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 9E of Chapter 32B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:-  
In the event that the governmental unit approves an increase in the percent of the 
premium to be contributed by its retired employees, the percent of premium being paid by a 
retired employee at that time will not be increased to the higher percent. 
SECTION 2. The provisions of this act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.